Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2 Rulemaking and Publications
4-5-230. Submission of list of adopted policies.

On July 1 of every year, each agency that is subject to review under chapter 29 of this title shall submit a list of all policies that have been adopted by the agencies in the past year to the chair of the government operations committee of the senate and the chair of the government operations committee of the house of representatives.

The information submitted under subdivision (a)(1) shall include a summary of the policy and the agency's justification for adopting a policy on the subject instead of promulgating a rule.

The following information shall not be required to be submitted to the chairs of the committees under subdivision (a)(2):

Records or other information deemed to be confidential under title 10, chapter 7, part 5 or otherwise not required to be disclosed or made available under § 10-7-503(a);

Records or other information that are required by an agency of the federal government for the purposes of securing federal funds, complying with federal law, maintaining national security, or qualifying for or maintaining required accreditation, the failure of which could jeopardize the loss of a federal program, funds, or accreditation; and

Statements, documents, or published materials, such as frequently asked questions, that are prepared and used in the course of general correspondence with persons or entities.

This section shall apply to all policies that are proposed or developed by agencies on or after July 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 929, § 3.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-5-231. Rules or policies that infringe on agency member's free speech prohibited — Power to remove member.

No agency created by statute and subject to review under chapter 29 of this title shall promulgate rules or implement policies that infringe on an agency member's freedom of speech in violation of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article I, § 19, or the First Amendment of the United States Constitution.

An agency's appointing authority shall have sole power to remove a member from a board, commission, council, committee, authority, task force, or other similar multi-member agency created by statute and subject to review under chapter 29 of this title. This subsection (b) shall not impair the ability of the general assembly to reconstitute, restructure, or reestablish such agency.

Acts 2018, ch. 929, § 3.